Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control
§ 67-1-37.
Powers and duties of Department of Revenue with respect to Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

The Department of Revenue, under its duties and powers with respect to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division therein, shall have the following powers, functions and duties:

To issue or refuse to issue any permit provided for by this chapter, or to extend the permit or remit in whole or any part of the permit monies when the permit cannot be used due to a natural disaster or act of God.

To revoke, suspend or cancel, for violation of or noncompliance with the provisions of this chapter, or the law governing the production and sale of native wines, or any lawful rules and regulations of the department issued hereunder, or for other sufficient cause, any permit issued by it under the provisions of this chapter. The department shall also be authorized to suspend the permit of any permit holder for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or Section 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or Section 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or Section 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

To prescribe forms of permits and applications for permits and of all reports which it deems necessary in administering this chapter.

To fix standards, not in conflict with those prescribed by any law of this state or of the United States, to secure the use of proper ingredients and methods of manufacture of alcoholic beverages.

To issue rules regulating the advertising of alcoholic beverages in the state in any class of media and permitting advertising of the retail price of alcoholic beverages.

To issue reasonable rules and regulations, not inconsistent with the federal laws or regulations, requiring informative labeling of all alcoholic beverages offered for sale within this state and providing for the standards of fill and shapes of retail containers of alcoholic beverages; however, such containers shall not contain less than fifty (50) milliliters by liquid measure.

Subject to the provisions of subsection (3) of Section 67-1-51, to issue rules and regulations governing the issuance of retail permits for premises located near or around schools, colleges, universities, churches and other public institutions, and specifying the distances therefrom within which no such permit shall be issued. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall not issue a package retailer’s or on-premises retailer’s permit for the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages in or on the campus of any public school, community or junior college, college or university.

To adopt and promulgate, repeal and amend, such rules, regulations, standards, requirements and orders, not inconsistent with this chapter or any law of this state or of the United States, as it deems necessary to control the manufacture, importation, transportation, distribution and sale of alcoholic liquor, whether intended for beverage or nonbeverage use in a manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter or any other statute, including the native wine laws.

To call upon other administrative departments of the state, county and municipal governments, county and city police departments and upon prosecuting officers for such information and assistance as it may deem necessary in the performance of its duties.

To prepare and submit to the Governor during the month of January of each year a detailed report of its official acts during the preceding fiscal year ending June 30, including such recommendations as it may see fit to make, and to transmit a like report to each member of the Legislature of this state upon the convening thereof at its next regular session.

To inspect, or cause to be inspected, any premises where alcoholic liquors intended for sale are manufactured, stored, distributed or sold, and to examine or cause to be examined all books and records pertaining to the business conducted therein.

To investigate the administration of laws in relation to alcoholic liquors in this and other states and any foreign countries, and to recommend from time to time to the Governor and through him to the Legislature of this state such amendments to this chapter, if any, as it may think desirable.

To designate hours and days when alcoholic beverages may be sold in different localities in the state which permit such sale.

To assign employees to posts of duty at locations where they will be most beneficial for the control of alcoholic beverages and to take any other action concerning persons employed under this chapter as authorized by law and taken in accordance with the rules, regulations and procedures of the State Personnel Board.

To enforce the provisions made unlawful by Chapter 3, Title 67 and Section 97-5-49.

To delegate its authority under this chapter to the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, its director or any other officer or employee of the department that it deems appropriate.

No alcoholic beverage shall be sold or consumed at any public athletic event at any public school, community or junior college, college or university.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-17; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 17; Laws, 1970, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 14; Laws, 1988, ch. 383, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 15; Laws, 1997, ch. 558, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1998, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 570, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 392, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 462, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 462, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 131; Laws, 2011, ch. 379, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 470, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 67-1-39.
Appeals from Board of Tax Appeals orders.

Any appeal from an order of the Board of Tax Appeals regarding an action taken under this chapter shall be filed without supersedeas to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, if the appellant is the department, or to the county of the domicile of any other appellant. Any such appeal shall be based on the record made before the Board of Tax Appeals and shall be filed within thirty (30) days from the date of the order being appealed. There may be an appeal therefrom to the Supreme Court as in other cases provided, but it shall be without supersedeas on the order of the Board of Tax Appeals to them made and finally determined either by the chancery court or the Supreme Court. Actions taken by the department in suspending a permit when required by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 are not actions resulting in an order from which an appeal may be taken under this section. Any appeal of a permit suspension that is required by Section 93-11-157 shall be taken in accordance with the appeal procedure specified in Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, rather than the procedure specified in this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-17; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 17; Laws, 1970, ch. 549, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 16; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 132, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 67-1-41.
Department of Revenue as a wholesale distributor and seller of alcoholic beverages; exception to department’s exclusive right to sell at wholesale.

The department is hereby created a wholesale distributor and seller of alcoholic beverages, not including malt liquors, within the State of Mississippi. It is granted the sole right to import and sell intoxicating liquors at wholesale within the state, and no person who is granted the right to sell, distribute or receive intoxicating liquors at retail shall purchase any intoxicating liquors from any source other than the department except as authorized in subsections (4) and (9). The department may establish warehouses, purchase intoxicating liquors in such quantities and from such sources as it may deem desirable and sell the intoxicating liquors to authorized permittees within the state including, at the discretion of the department, any retail distributors operating within any military post or qualified resort areas within the boundaries of the state, keeping a correct and accurate record of all such transactions and exercising such control over the distribution of alcoholic beverages as seem right and proper in keeping with the provisions or purposes of this chapter.

No person for the purpose of sale shall manufacture, distill, brew, sell, possess, export, transport, distribute, warehouse, store, solicit, take orders for, bottle, rectify, blend, treat, mix or process any alcoholic beverage except in accordance with authority granted under this chapter, or as otherwise provided by law for native wines.

No alcoholic beverage intended for sale or resale shall be imported, shipped or brought into this state for delivery to any person other than as provided in this chapter, or as otherwise provided by law for native wines.

The department may promulgate rules and regulations which authorize on-premises retailers to purchase limited amounts of alcoholic beverages from package retailers and for package retailers to purchase limited amounts of alcoholic beverages from other package retailers. The department shall develop and provide forms to be completed by the on-premises retailers and the package retailers verifying the transaction. The completed forms shall be forwarded to the department within a period of time prescribed by the department.

The department may promulgate rules which authorize the holder of a package retailer’s permit to permit individual retail purchasers of packages of alcoholic beverages to return, for exchange, credit or refund, limited amounts of original sealed and unopened packages of alcoholic beverages purchased by the individual from the package retailer.

The department shall maintain all forms to be completed by applicants necessary for licensure by the department at all district offices of the department.

The department may promulgate rules which authorize the manufacturer of an alcoholic beverage or wine to import, transport and furnish or give a sample of alcoholic beverages or wines to the holders of package retailer’s permits, on-premises retailer’s permits, native wine retailer’s permits and temporary retailer’s permits who have not previously purchased the brand of that manufacturer from the department. For each holder of the designated permits, the manufacturer may furnish not more than five hundred (500) milliliters of any brand of alcoholic beverage and not more than three (3) liters of any brand of wine.

The department may promulgate rules disallowing open product sampling of alcoholic beverages or wines by the holders of package retailer’s permits and permitting open product sampling of alcoholic beverages by the holders of on-premises retailer’s permits. Permitted sample products shall be plainly identified “sample” and the actual sampling must occur in the presence of the manufacturer’s representatives during the legal operating hours of on-premises retailers.

The department may promulgate rules and regulations that authorize the holder of a research permit to import and purchase limited amounts of alcoholic beverages from importers, wineries and distillers of alcoholic beverages or from the department. The department shall develop and provide forms to be completed by the research permittee verifying each transaction. The completed forms shall be forwarded to the department within a period of time prescribed by the department. The records and inventory of alcoholic beverages shall be open to inspection at any time by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division or any duly authorized agent.

This section shall not apply to alcoholic beverages authorized to be sold by the holder of a distillery retailer’s permit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-18; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 18; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 15; Laws, 1988, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 479, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 574, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 408, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 352, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 529, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 3, 2006); Laws, 2018, ch. 453, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-1-43.
Obtaining intoxicants from source other than commission; penalty.

Any authorized retail distributor who shall purchase or receive intoxicating liquor from any source except from the commission, unless authorized by rules and regulations of the commission promulgated under subsection (4) of Section 67-1-41, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months. Any authorization of such person to sell intoxicating beverages may be revoked as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-18; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 18; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 16; Laws, 1988, ch. 397, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 352, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 67-1-45.
Selling intoxicants to source other than commission; penalty.

No manufacturer, rectifier, or distiller of intoxicating liquor shall sell or attempt to sell any such intoxicating liquor, except malt liquor, within the State of Mississippi, except to the commission, or to the holder of a research permit as provided in Section 67-1-41. A producer of native wine may sell native wines to the commission or to consumers at the location of the native winery or its immediate vicinity.

Any violation of this section by any manufacturer, rectifier, or distiller shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and not more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), to which may be added imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-18; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 18; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 17; Laws, 1994, ch. 538, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 352, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§ 67-1-46.
Certain holders of manufacturer’s distiller’s permits authorized to provide limited amounts of alcoholic beverages on premises for tasting or sampling subject to certain conditions.

The holder of a manufacturer’s distiller’s permit who distills alcoholic beverages at a distillery located in this state may offer and provide limited amounts of alcoholic beverages on the premises of the distillery for the purpose of tasting or sampling, subject to the following conditions:

The alcoholic beverages provided for tasting or sampling must be manufactured in this state by the holder of the permit operating the distillery at the site of and on the premises of the distillery;

The alcoholic beverages may be provided only to persons on the premises of the distillery at no cost and for consumption on the premises of the distillery;

The alcoholic beverages may be provided for tasting or sampling between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. on the same day and only in conjunction with a structured tour of the distillery and related facilities which must include the entire manufacturing and distilling processes and methods used at the distillery;

No one under twenty-one (21) years of age may participate in the tasting or sampling, and a sign indicating that prohibition shall be placed in a visible location at the entrance to the area where the tasting or sampling will be conducted;

An individual size sample of alcoholic beverages shall not exceed one-fourth (1/4) ounce, and no more than four (4) samples of alcoholic beverages may be provided to an individual within a twenty-four-hour period; and

The holder of the permit operating the distillery shall keep an accurate accounting of the various alcoholic beverages provided and consumed as samples.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 352, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 2013).

§ 67-1-47.
Distillers and distributors dealing with commission shall register with Secretary of State.

All distillers or distributors having contracts with the State Tax Commission for the sale of alcoholic beverages to the State Tax Commission, before making delivery of any merchandise to the State Tax Commission, shall register with the Secretary of State giving their name, address, name of all local agents and any other pertinent information which may be required by the Secretary of State and appointing an agent for the service of process within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-41; Laws, 1968, ch. 526, § 1, eff and in force thirty (30) days after approval (approved August 7, 1968).

§ 67-1-49.
Distillers and distributors dealing with commission shall file statements of salary expenses.

All distillers or distributors having contracts with the State Tax Commission for the sale of alcoholic beverages to said commission, shall, on or before February 1st of each year, file a statement, under oath, with the State Tax Commission and with the Secretary of State, listing the names and addresses of each person, firm or corporation in Mississippi to whom or which said distiller or distributor shall have paid or agreed to pay any fee, retainer, salary, or remuneration, during the preceding year, together with a statement of the purpose for such payment. Failure to file such statement shall constitute grounds for the commission to suspend the right of the distiller or distributor to sell to said commission until such time as said statement shall be filed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-42; Laws, 1968, ch. 526, § 2, eff and in force thirty (30) days after approval (approved August 7, 1968).